Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 5. Director of the State Department of Audit
§ 9-1-513.
School finance audits and management studies.

In addition to other duties prescribed under this article, the director of the department of audit shall establish a school finance section within the department to carry out duties prescribed by this section.

The school finance section within the department established under subsection (a) of this section shall:

Conduct periodic audits of each school district pertaining to data required to be submitted to the department of education under law and by rule and regulation of the state superintendent of public instruction for purposes of implementing and operating the “school finance system” as defined under W.S. 21-2-203(a). Audits under this paragraph shall include audits of systems supporting data collection and shall be performed on each school district at least once within each three (3) year period;

Conduct management studies of school districts including program evaluations and performance audits, on issues identified by the advisory committee to the department of education, as established under W.S. 21-2-203(d);

Conduct compliance and effectiveness and efficiency audits of the state department of education with respect to data used in the school finance system, implementation and computations under the school finance system and the allocation of funds to school districts through the school finance system;

Report findings and recommendations to the department of education resulting from audits and studies conducted on school districts pursuant to this subsection, including recommendations for remedies to identified problems and issues and including the identification and quantification of amounts involved in audit report and study findings;

In addition to paragraph (b)(iv) of this section, provide a written report of each audit or study to the school district for which the audit or report was conducted;

Maintain a written report of each audit and study conducted under this section;

Establish a process to ensure school districts and the department of education address and resolve any problems identified within audit and report findings and recommendations and establish the determination of the materiality levels for findings;

Provide an annual report to the legislature on audits and studies conducted by the department under this section and on district and department of education efforts to resolve identified problems within the audits and reports. Reports under this paragraph shall include written responses by the districts and the department of education submitted in accordance with subsection (c) of this section;

As a part of the requirements under paragraph (i) of this subsection, conduct periodic audits of career and technical education information and computations submitted by districts as necessary for implementation of W.S. 21-13-309(m)(v)(D) and include audit findings in the report to the department of education required under paragraph (iv) of this subsection and the report to the legislature required under paragraph (viii) of this subsection.

School districts and the department of education shall provide access to all data and other information and shall cooperate with the school finance section as necessary to implement this section and to conduct audits and reports required under this section. In addition, each district shall within thirty (30) days following receipt of a copy of the audit or report, file a written response to each audit or report conducted on that district with the department. The state superintendent shall on behalf of the department of education and within thirty (30) days following receipt of a report or audit on the department, file a written response to the report with the department of audit.

The director or his designee shall participate in the advisory committee to the department of education, as required under W.S. 21-2-203(d).

History.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 76, § 1; 2003, ch. 164, § 2; 2006, ch. 37, § 1; 2010, ch. 1, § 1; 2011, ch. 185, § 1; 2013 ch. 1, § 2, effective January 29, 2013; 2015 ch. 30, § 1, effective February 25, 2015; 2021 ch. 66, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to career-vocational education program grants, see §

21-12-105

.

As to qualification and limitations on funding eligibility for vocational education, and adjustment to foundation program formula, see §

21-13-329

.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, in (b), deleted “division of data management and reporting of the” following “committee to the” in (ii), in (ix), substituted “As a part of the requirements under” for “In addition to,” and “as necessary for implementation of W.S. 21-13-309(m)(v)(D)” for “in accordance with W.S.

21-13-329

”; deleted “division of data management and reporting of the” following “committee to the” in (d).

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, deleted the former last sentence of (b)(ix), which read: “Each district shall be audited for purposes of this paragraph not less than once every three (3) years.”

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (b)(ix), substituted “career-vocational” for “vocational.”

The 2013 amendment,

in (i), substituted “director of the department of education” for “state superintendent of public instruction”; and substituted “director” for “state superintendent in the last sentence of (c).

Laws 2013, ch 1, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved January 29, 2013.

The 2015 amendment,

in the first sentence in (b)(i), substituted “state superintendent of public instruction” for “director of the department of education”; and in the last sentence in (c), substituted “state superintendent” for “director.”

Laws 2015, ch. 30, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, substituted "career and technical" for "career-vocational" in (b)(ix).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 76, § 11, directs that all records and other information pertaining to the school finance audit section within the legislative service office, together with all standards and procedures for auditing school district data, be transferred to the department of audit as necessary to implement W.S.

9-1-513

as created under section 1 of the act.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2005, ch. 99, § 3, effective July 1, 2005, appropriates $292,338 from the general fund to the department of audit and authorizes 4 additional full-time positions for the administration of
W.S.

9-1-513

for the period beginning July 1, 2005, and ending June 30, 2006. The appropriation and positions authorized are to be reduced by any positions and any amount of funding for K-12 public school auditors provided in general session 2005 Senate File 1 (Laws 2005, ch. 191), as enacted into law.

2013 amendment unconstitutional. —

Senate Enrolled Act 1 (Laws 2013, Chapter 1), which amended this section, is unconstitutional, as it deprives the State Superintendent of Public Instruction the power of ?general supervision of the public schools? that is entrusted to the Superintendent in
Wyo. Const. art. 7, ? 14.
Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2014), and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014).